Utah statutes.
62A-7-401.5.   Secure facilities.

(1)  The division shall maintain and operate secure facilities for the custody and rehabilitation of youth offenders who pose a danger of serious bodily harm to others, who cannot be controlled in a less secure setting, or who have engaged in a pattern of conduct characterized by persistent and serious criminal offenses which, as demonstrated through the use of other alternatives, cannot be controlled in a less secure setting.

(2) The director shall appoint an administrator for each secure facility.  An administrator of a secure facility shall have experience in social work, law, criminology, corrections, or a related field, and also in administration.

(3) (a)  The division, in cooperation with the State Board of Education, shall provide instruction, or make instruction available, to youth offenders in secure facilities. The instruction shall be appropriate to the age, needs, and range of abilities of the youth offender. 

(b)  An assessment shall be made of each youth offender by the appropriate secure facility to determine the offender's abilities, possible learning disabilities, interests, attitudes, and other attributes related to appropriate educational programs.

(c)  Prevocational education shall be provided to acquaint youth offenders with vocations, and vocational requirements and opportunities.

(4)  The division shall place youth offenders who have been committed to the division for secure confinement and rehabilitation in a secure facility, operated by the division or by a private entity, that is appropriate to ensure that humane care and rehabilitation opportunities are afforded to the youth offender.

(5)  The division shall adopt, subject to approval by the board, standards, policies, and procedures for the regulation and operation of secure facilities, consistent with state and federal law.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

